Washington statutes.
RCW 18.39.130

Licenses—Applicants from other states—Examination.

The board may recognize licenses issued to funeral directors or embalmers from other states and extend reciprocity to an applicant if the applicant furnishes satisfactory evidence that the applicant holds a valid license issued by another licensing authority recognized by the board as having qualifications for licensure that are substantially equivalent to those required by this chapter on the date of original licensure or licensure with the other licensing authority. Five years active experience as a licensee may be accepted to make up a deficit in the comparable education requirements.

The board may issue a funeral director's or embalmer's license upon:

(1) Presentation of the license verification;

(2) Payment of a fee determined under RCW 43.24.086;

(3) Successful completion of the examination of the laws of this state pertaining to the handling, care, transportation, and disposition of human remains and the contents of this chapter.

[ 2005 c 365 s 9; 1996 c 217 s 5. Prior: 1986 c 259 s 60; 1985 c 7 s 39; 1982 c 66 s 22; 1981 c 43 s 8; 1975 1st ex.s. c 30 s 44; 1937 c 108 s 15; RRS s 8325; prior: 1909 c 215 s 16.]

NOTES:

Severability—1986 c 259: See note following RCW 18.130.010.

Effective dates—1982 c 66: See note following RCW 18.39.240.